lexd/lez_num.lexd
PATTERN Numerals
(Base | BaseException(1) | Teens | Ten | Tens | Thousand) [<num>:] ([>] NumAbsPl)?
(Base | BaseException(1) | Teens | Ten | Tens | Thousand) [<num>:] [>] (NumOblSg | NumOblPl) [<erg>:]
(Base | BaseException(1) | Teens | Ten | Tens | Thousand) [<num>:] (NumOblSg | ([>] NumOblPl)) [>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
(Base | BaseException(1) | Teens | Ten | Tens | Thousand) [<num>:] (NumOblSg | ([>] NumOblPl)) [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
TensAdd [<num>:] [>] Add
Hundred [<num>:]
BaseException(2) [<num>:] 
NumeralReduplication ((:Base [>] Base) | (:Teens [>] Teens) | (:Ten [>] Ten)) [<num>:] ([>] NumOblSg [<erg>:])?
NumeralReduplication ((:Base [>] Base) | (:Teens [>] Teens) | (:Ten [>] Ten)) [<num>:] NumOblSg [>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
NumeralReduplication ((:Base [>] Base) | (:Teens [>] Teens) | (:Ten [>] Ten)) [<num>:] NumOblSg [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
NumeralReduplication :BaseException(2) [>] BaseException(1) [<num>:] ([>] NumOblSg [<erg>:])?
NumeralReduplication :BaseException(2) [>] BaseException(1) [<num>:] NumOblSg [>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
NumeralReduplication :BaseException(2) [>] BaseException(1) [<num>:] NumOblSg [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
NumeralReduplication :BaseException(1) [>] BaseException(1) [<num>:] ([>] NumOblSg [<erg>:])?
NumeralReduplication :BaseException(1) [>] BaseException(1) [<num>:] NumOblSg [>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
NumeralReduplication :BaseException(1) [>] BaseException(1) [<num>:] NumOblSg [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
OrdinalMarker [<ord>:]

LEXICON NumeralReduplication
<rdp>:

LEXICON BaseException(2)
сад са # 1
кьвед кьве # 2

LEXICON OrdinalMarker
лагьай

LEXICON Base
пуд # 3
кьуд # 4
вад # 5
ругуд # 6
ирид # 7
муьжуьд # 8
кӀуьд # 9

LEXICON Teens
цӀусад # 11
цӀикьвед # 12
цӀипуд # 13
цӀукьуд # 14
цӀувад # 15
цӀуругуд # 16
цӀеирид # 17
цӀемуьжуьд # 18
цӀекӀуьд # 19

LEXICON Ten
цӀуд # 10

LEXICON Tens
къад # 20
яхцӀур # 40
пудкъад # 60
кьудкъад # 80

LEXICON TensAdd
къад:къан # 20
яхцӀур:яхцӀур # 40
пудкъад:пудкъан # 60
кьудкъад:кьудкъан # 80

LEXICON Add
<add>:ни

LEXICON Hundred
виш #100

LEXICON Thousand
агъзур # 1000

LEXICON NumAbsPl 
<pl><abs>:ар # Субстантивное склонение
<pl><abs>:бур # Адъективное склонение

LEXICON NumOblSg
:а

LEXICON NumOblPl
<pl>:ри # Субстантивное склонение
<pl>:буру # Адъективное склонение
